Illinois, session 104th, HB2439.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-8A-3 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-8A-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8A-3)7    Sec. 5-8A-3. Application. 8    (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), a person charged 9with or convicted of an excluded offense may not be placed in 10an electronic monitoring or home detention program, except for 11bond pending trial or appeal or while on parole, aftercare 12release, or mandatory supervised release.13    (b) A person serving a sentence for a conviction of a Class 141 felony, other than an excluded offense, may be placed in an 15electronic monitoring or home detention program for a period 16not to exceed the last 90 days of incarceration.17    (c) A person serving a sentence for a conviction of a Class 18X felony, other than an excluded offense, may be placed in an 19electronic monitoring or home detention program for a period 20not to exceed the last 90 days of incarceration, provided that 21the person was sentenced on or after August 11, 1993 (the 22effective date of Public Act 88-311) and provided that the 23court has not prohibited the program for the person in the   HB2439- 2 -LRB104 08203 RLC 18253 b1sentencing order.2    (d) A person serving a sentence for conviction of an 3offense that is a Class X or Class 1 felony, other than for 4predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 5criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, aggravated 6criminal sexual abuse, or felony criminal sexual abuse, may be 7placed in an electronic monitoring or home detention program 8for a period not to exceed the last 18 12 months of 9incarceration, provided that (i) the person is 50 55 years of 10age or older; (ii) the person is serving a determinate 11sentence; (iii) the person has served at least 25% of the 12sentenced prison term; and (iv) placement in an electronic 13monitoring or home detention program is approved by the 14Prisoner Review Board or the Department of Juvenile Justice.15    (e) A person serving a sentence for conviction of a Class 162, 3, or 4 felony offense which is not an excluded offense may 17be placed in an electronic monitoring or home detention 18program pursuant to Department administrative directives. 19These directives shall encourage inmates to apply for 20electronic detention to incentivize positive behavior and 21program participation prior to and following their return to 22the community, consistent with Section 5-8A-4.2 of this Code. 23These directives shall not prohibit application solely for 24prior mandatory supervised release violation history, 25outstanding municipal warrants, current security 26classification, and prior criminal history, though these   HB2439- 3 -LRB104 08203 RLC 18253 b1factors may be considered when reviewing individual 2applications in conjunction with additional factors, such as 3the applicant's institution behavior, program participation, 4and reentry plan.5    (f) Applications for electronic monitoring or home 6detention may include the following:7        (1) pretrial or pre-adjudicatory detention;8        (2) probation;9        (3) conditional discharge;10        (4) periodic imprisonment;11        (5) parole, aftercare release, or mandatory supervised 12    release;13        (6) work release;14        (7) furlough; or15        (8) post-trial incarceration.16    (g) A person convicted of an offense described in clause 17(4) or (5) of subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code 18shall be placed in an electronic monitoring or home detention 19program for at least the first 2 years of the person's 20mandatory supervised release term.21(Source: P.A. 99-628, eff. 1-1-17; 99-797, eff. 8-12-16; 22100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 100-431, eff. 8-25-17; 100-575, eff. 231-8-18.)